Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-146.09
Biological parent; deceased; release of information.

If the department has verified information indicating that both biological parents of the adopted person are deceased or if only one biological parent is known and verified information indicates that such parent is deceased, all information on the adopted person's original birth certificate regarding such deceased parent or parents shall be released to the adopted person upon request. The department shall establish a policy for verifying information about the death of the biological parent or parents.

Laws 1988, LB 372, § 14;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 50;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 98.